Hawaii statutes.
§39A‑89 Access to and public
disclosure of financial records of project party. (a) Each project party
with a project agreement with the department shall allow the department full
access to the project party's financial records. Upon the request of the
department for the examination of any such financial records, the project party
shall allow the department to examine the requested records within a reasonably
prompt time from the date of the request. If the department requests copies of
the records, the project party shall provide the copies.

(b) To provide the public with full knowledge
of the use of the proceeds and benefits derived from special purpose revenue
bonds issued under this part, the department shall require each project party
with a project agreement with the department to make available to the public
all relevant financial records which pertain to the use of or savings resulting
from the use of special purpose revenue bonds.

(c) The department shall adopt rules under
chapter 91 for the purposes of this section. [L 1981, c 120, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next